Mississippi statutes. Title 55. Parks and Recreation
Vietnam Veterans Memorial

§ 55-15-71.
Vietnam Veterans Memorial.

The board of supervisors of any county and the governing authorities of any municipality are hereby authorized and empowered, in their discretion, to make contributions out of any available county or municipal funds, as appropriate, to a nonprofit corporation established for the purpose of constructing a Vietnam Veterans Memorial on the Mississippi Gulf Coast.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 458, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 25, 1989).